Tennessee, session 114, HB2597.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 71, Chapter 5, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Birthing center" has the same meaning as defined in § 68-11-201;
and
(2) "Hospital" has the same meaning as defined in § 68-11-201(31)(A)
and (B).
(b) The bureau of TennCare shall:
(1) Create a methodology to determine medicaid facility fee
reimbursement rates for birthing centers that are comparable to rates for similar
services provided at a hospital; and
(2) Require annual increases to birthing center medicaid facility fee
reimbursement rates that are equivalent to hospital medicaid reimbursement rate
increases.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 68, Chapter 1, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a)
(1) "Birthing center" has the same meaning as defined in § 68-11-201;
and
HB2597
012327
- 1 -

(2) "Hospital" has the same meaning as defined in § 68-11-201(31)(A)
and (B).
(b) In making decisions as to the allocation of the federal rural health
transportation program grant funds received by the department from the centers for
medicare and medicaid services (CMS), the department of health shall give funding
priority to birthing centers in this state, with first priority to birthing centers in rural
counties, and second priority to birthing centers in urban counties that provide services
to residents of rural counties that do not have a birthing center or hospital with a
maternity ward.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 012327